src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Livonian noun inflection
! ---------------

!! This file documents `affixes/nouns.lexc`, the Livonian noun inflection file.


!! ## Ad hoc lexica


!! PROBLEMS with dictionary lexica

LEXICON N_  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
: # ;
!LEXICON N_¤51  !!≈ * __@CODE@__   
!: # ;
!LEXICON N_37  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
!: # ;
LEXICON N_¤29  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
: # ;

!! ## Stem lexica
LEXICON N_PŪ !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains pū: 12
!! ~156
 NMN_PŪ ;

LEXICON N_PŪ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains pū: 12
 NMN_PŪ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_RǬʼ !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains rǭʼ:rǭʼ 13
 NMN_RǬʼ	;

LEXICON N_PǞ !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains pǟ:pǟ 14
 NMN_PǞ	;

LEXICON N_TĪE !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains tīe:tīe 15
 NMN_TĪE	;
	
LEXICON N_TĪE-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains tīe:tīe 15
     NMN_TĪE-PL   ;

LEXICON N_BRĪ !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains brī:brī 16
 NMN_BRĪ	  ;
	
LEXICON N_TEI !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains tei:tei 17
 NMN_TEI	;

LEXICON N_KUŖĒ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18
     NMN_KUŖĒ   ;

!LEXICON N_KUŖĒ-SG  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18
!     NMN_KUŖĒ-SG    ;

!LEXICON N_KUŖĒ-PL  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18
!     NMN_KUŖĒ-PL    ;


LEXICON N_KALĀ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
 NMN_KALĀ   ;

LEXICON N_KALĀ-SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
 NMN_KALĀ-SG    ;

LEXICON N_KALĀ-PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
 NMN_KALĀ-PL    ;

LEXICON N_IRĒ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  irē:iʼr 18
 NMN_IRĒ   ;

LEXICON N_IRĒ-SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  irē:iʼr 18
 NMN_IRĒ-SG    ;

LEXICON N_IRĒ-PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contains  irē:iʼr 18
 NMN_IRĒ-PL    ;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** tubā:tuʼbā 19
 	N_TUBĀ-SG	;
 	N_TUBĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** tubā:tuʼbā 19
 NMN_TUBĀ-SG   ;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** tubā:tuʼbā 19
 NMN_TUBĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AMĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** amā:aʼm 19a
 	N_AMĀ-SG	;
 	N_AMĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_AMĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** amā:aʼm 19a
 NMN_AMĀ-SG   ;

LEXICON N_AMĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** amā:aʼm 19a
 NMN_AMĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AIGĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** aigā:aigā 20
 NMN_AIGĀ	;

LEXICON N_LĒBA !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēba:leiba 21
 NMN_LĒBA	;

LEXICON N_KŪJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kūja:lēba 21
 NMN_KŪJA	;

LEXICON N_PŪOGA !!≈ * **@CODE@** pūoga:pūoga 22
 NMN_PŪOGA	;

LEXICON N_LǬJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** lǭja:lǭja 23
	N_LǬJA-SG	;
	N_LǬJA-PL	;

LEXICON N_LǬJA-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** lǭja:lǭja 23
     NMN_LǬJA-SG   ;

LEXICON N_LǬJA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** lǭja:lǭja 23
     NMN_LǬJA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PǞVA !!≈ * **@CODE@** pǟva:pǟva 24
 NMN_PǞVA	;

LEXICON N_PǞVA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** pǟva:pǟva 24
     NMN_PǞVA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_IZĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** izā:izā 25
 NMN_IZĀ	;

LEXICON N_PIEZĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** piezā:pieʼzzā 25
 NMN_PIEZĀ	;

LEXICON N_AŽĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** ažā:aʼžā 26
	N_AŽĀ-SG	;
	N_AŽĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_AŽĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** ažā:aʼžžā 26
     NMN_AŽĀ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_AŽĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** ažā:aʼžžā 26
     NMN_AŽĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA !!≈ * **@CODE@** āļdža:āļdža 27
	N_ĀĻDŽA-SG       ;
        N_ĀĻDŽA-PL       ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** āļdža:āļdža 27
     NMN_ĀĻDŽA-SG   ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** āļdža:āļdža 27
     NMN_ĀĻDŽA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SUKĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** sukā:sukā 28
 NMN_SUKĀ	;

LEXICON N_LIEPĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** liepā:liepā 29
 NMN_LIEPĀ	;

LEXICON N_OKSĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** oksā:oksā 30
 NMN_OKSĀ	;

LEXICON N_VȰNTSA !!≈ * **@CODE@** vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31
 NMN_VȰNTSA	;

LEXICON N_LIESTĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** liestā:liestā 32
 NMN_LIESTĀ	;

LEXICON N_ĀIGA !!≈ * **@CODE@** āiga:āiga 33
 NMN_ĀIGA	;

LEXICON N_LĀNGA !!≈ * **@CODE@** lānga:lānga 33
 NMN_LĀNGA	;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** sīlma:sīlma 34
	N_SĪLMA-SG ;
	N_SĪLMA-PL ;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA-SG
 NMN_SĪLMA-SG	;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** sīlma:sīlma 34
     NMN_SĪLMA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KǞNGA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kǟnga:kǟnga 35
 NMN_KǞNGA	;

LEXICON N_ĀINA !!≈ * **@CODE@** āina:āina 36
	N_ĀINA-SG	;
	N_ĀINA-PL	;

LEXICON N_ĀINA-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** āina:āina 36
     NMN_ĀINA-SG   ;

LEXICON N_ĀINA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** āina:āina 36
     NMN_ĀINA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VĒNA !!≈ * **@CODE@** vēna:vēna 37
 NMN_VĒNA	;

LEXICON N_RŌDA !!≈ * **@CODE@** rōda:rōda 38
 NMN_RŌDA	;

LEXICON N_RŌDA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** rōda:rōda 38
     NMN_RŌDA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** padā:padā 39
 NMN_PADĀ   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** padā:padā 39
 NMN_PADĀ-SG   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** padā:padā 39
 NMN_PADĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** sõbrā:sõbrā 40
	N_SÕBRĀ-SG	;
	N_SÕBRĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** sõbrā:sõbrā 40
 NMN_SÕBRĀ-SG  ;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** sõbrā:sõbrā 40
 NMN_SÕBRĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** käpā:käpā 41
     N_KÄPĀ-SG  ;
     N_KÄPĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** käpā:käpā 41
     NMN_KÄPĀ-SG  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** käpā:käpā 41
     NMN_KÄPĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_MAKSĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** maksā:maksā 42
     NMN_PADĀ  ;
!LEXICON N_MAKSĀ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ maksā:maksā 42
!     NMN_PADĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĒRA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kēra:kēra 43
 NMN_KĒRA	;

LEXICON N_JǬRA !!≈ * **@CODE@** jǭra:jǭra 44
 NMN_JǬRA	;
!LEXICON N_JǬRA-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ jǭra:jǭra 44
! NMN_JǬRA-PL	;

LEXICON N_PŪOLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** pūola:pūola 45
 NMN_PŪOLA	;

LEXICON N_ĀITA !!≈ * **@CODE@** āita:āita 46
 NMN_ĀITA	;

LEXICON N_ĀITA-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** āita:āita 46
     NMN_ĀITA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ŪŠKA !!≈ * **@CODE@** ūška:ūška 47
 NMN_ŪŠKA	;

LEXICON N_MȬKA !!≈ * **@CODE@** mȭka:mȭka 48
 NMN_MȬKA	;

LEXICON N_DADŽĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** dadžā:daʼdžā 49
	N_DADŽĀ-SG	;
	N_DADŽĀ-PL	;
LEXICON N_DADŽĀ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** dadžā:daʼdžā 49
 NMN_DADŽĀ-SG	;
LEXICON N_DADŽĀ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** dadžā:daʼdžā 49
 NMN_DADŽĀ-PL	;

LEXICON N_SUŠĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** sušā:sušā 50
 NMN_SUŠĀ	;

LEXICON N_KUPŠĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kupšā:kupšā 51
 NMN_KUPŠĀ	;

LEXICON N_TŠŪRTŠA !!≈ * **@CODE@** tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
 NMN_TŠŪRTŠA	;

LEXICON N_SĒMḐA !!≈ * **@CODE@** sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53
 NMN_SĒMḐA	;

!LEXICON N_TĪERA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tīera:tīera 54
! N_TĪERA-SG ;
! N_TĪERA-PL ;
!LEXICON N_TĪERA-SG
! NMN_TĪERA-SG	;
!LEXICON N_TĪERA-PL
! NMN_TĪERA-PL	;

LEXICON N_KRǬIPA !!≈ * **@CODE@** krǭipa:krǭipa 55
 NMN_KRǬIPA	;

LEXICON N_LILLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuțā:kuțā 57
 NMN_LILLA	;

LEXICON N_KAFFE !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuțā:kuțā 57
 NMN_KAFFE	;

LEXICON N_KUȚĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuțā:kuțā 57
 NMN_KUȚĀ	;

LEXICON N_NĒTŠA !!≈ * **@CODE@** nētša:nētša 58
 NMN_NĒTŠA	;

LEXICON N_KIʼV !!≈ * **@CODE@** kiʼv:kiv 59
	N_KIʼV-SG  ;
	N_KIʼV-PL  ;
LEXICON N_KIʼV-SG
 NMN_KIʼV-SG	;
LEXICON N_KIʼV-PL
 NMN_KIʼV-PL	;

LEXICON N_KUOʼIG !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuoʼig:kuoʼig 60
 NMN_KUOʼIG	;

LEXICON N_KEP !!≈ * **@CODE@** kep:kep aʼb 61
        N_KEP-SG   ;
        N_KEP-PL   ;
LEXICON N_KEP-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** kep:kep aʼb 61
     NMN_KEP-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KEP-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** kep:kep aʼb 61
     NMN_KEP-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KRUȚK !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 62
 NMN_KRUȚK	;

LEXICON N_KRÄMP !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 63
 NMN_KRÄMP	;

LEXICON N_PIʼŅ !!≈ * **@CODE@** piʼņ:piņ 64
	N_PIʼŅ-SG	;
	N_PIʼŅ-PL	;
LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** piʼņ:piņ 64
     NMN_PIʼŅ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** piʼņ:piņ 64
     NMN_PIʼŅ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KUOȚ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 65
 NMN_KUOȚ	;
LEXICON N_KUOȚ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 65
     NMN_KUOȚ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VAKȚ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 66
 NMN_VAKȚ	;

LEXICON N_REŅ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 67
 NMN_REŅ	;

LEXICON N_OKŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 68
 NMN_OKŠ	;

LEXICON N_KAŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 69
 NMN_KAŠ	;

LEXICON N_DUŅTŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 70
 NMN_DUŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_TORĪ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 71
 NMN_TORĪ	;

LEXICON N_VAʼG !!≈ * **@CODE@** vaʼg:vag 72
 NMN_VAʼG	;
LEXICON N_VAʼG-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** vaʼg:vag 72
     NMN_VAʼG-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KÕʼL !!≈ * **@CODE@** kõʼl:kõl 73
 NMN_KÕʼL	;

LEXICON N_SUʼG !!≈ * **@CODE@** suʼg:sug 74
 NMN_SUʼG	;

LEXICON N_JOʼUG !!≈ * **@CODE@** joʼug:joug 75
 NMN_JOʼUG	;

LEXICON N_NIʼM !!≈ * **@CODE@** niʼm:nim 76
 NMN_NIʼM	;
LEXICON N_NIʼM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** niʼm:nim 76
     NMN_NIʼM-PL   ;
