src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
konkš+N:kōnkš N_DUŅTŠ  "nuija" ;
kol+N:koʼl N_KÕʼL  "kammio" ;
krämp+N:krǟmp N_KRÄMP  "kouristus" ;
kuodtīe+N:kuoʼd#tīʼe N_TĪE  "kotitehtävä" ;
kupšā+N:kupšā N_KUPŠĀ  "ostelija" ;
kuŗē+N:kuʼŗ N_KUŖĒ  "paholainen" ;
kāibakuțā+N:kāiba#kuțā N_KUȚĀ  "kantelupukki" ;
kēja+N:kēija N_LĒBA  "tahko" ;
kūja+N:kūja N_KŪJA  "kuivuus" ;
lakād+N:lakkā N_KÄPĀ-PL  "harja" ;
liepā+N:lieppā N_LIEPĀ  "leppä" ;
lānga+N:lānga N_LĀNGA  "lanka" ;
lōka+N:lōuka N_RŌDA  "laukka" ;
lūodpūd+N:lūodõ#pū N_PŪ-PL  "luomapuut" ;
lūvalūd+N:lū#vaʼl N_NIʼM-PL  "luusärky" ;
lǟlamjālgad+N:lǟlam#jālga N_SĪLMA-PL  "raskaus" ;
mai+N:mai N_BRĪ  "toukokuu" ;
mandõlpū+N:mandõl#pū N_PŪ  "mantelipuu" ;
midžā+N:miʼdžā N_DADŽĀ  "karhunkuoppa" ;
munā+N:muʼn N_KALĀ  "muna" ;
munād+N:muʼnā N_KALĀ-PL  "kivekset" ;
mõtsātīed+N:mõtsā#tīʼe N_TĪE-PL  "metsänhakkuu" ;
mǟrga+N:mǟrga N_KǞNGA  "mätä" ;
mōrjei+N:mǭr#jei N_BRĪ  "aluna" ;
naț+N:națț N_KUOȚ  "merenneito" ;
nōra+N:nǭrra N_JǬRA  "merenneito" ;
oksā+N:oksā N_OKSĀ  "oksa" ;
ovriestā+N:oʼv#riestā N_LIESTĀ  "havupuun oksa" ;
papīerkrežā+N:papīer#kreʼžžā N_AŽĀ  "paperikori" ;
papīerrō+N:papīer#rǭʼ N_RǬʼ  "paperiraha" ;
paskā+N:paskā N_MAKSĀ  "paska" ;
paldõbrejā+N:paʼldõb#reʼj N_TUBĀ  "" ;
pierzjālga+N:pierz#jālga N_SĪLMA  "lapasotka" ;
pivād+N:piʼv N_TUBĀ-PL  "iltama" ;
pițkīzpǟ+N:pițkīz#pǟ N_PǞ  "ukkospilvi" ;
poḑīd+N:poʼḑ N_PIʼŅ-PL  "roju" ;
punā+N:puʼnā N_KALĀ-SG  "puna" ;
pōtša+N:pōtša N_NĒTŠA  "poju" ;
pūola+N:pūolla N_PŪOLA  "polvi" ;
pūtīe+N:pū#tīʼe N_TĪE  "puutyö" ;
pūojnabā+N:pūʼoj#naʼbbā N_PADĀ-SG  "pohjoisnapa" ;
pōžkiv+N:pǭž#kiʼvv N_KIʼV  "dolomiitti" ;
rabā+N:raʼbbā N_PADĀ  "oluen mäski" ;
rabād+N:raʼbbā N_PADĀ-PL  "mäski" ;
reņ+N:rēņņ N_REŅ  "ränni" ;
rieklēba+N:riek#lēiba N_LĒBA  "eväs" ;
rištizā+N:rišt#iʼzzā N_IZĀ  "kummisetä" ;
rištlūd+N:rišt#lū N_PŪ-PL  "ristiselkä" ;
rōdad+N:rōuda N_RŌDA-PL  "kahleet" ;
rǟnka+N:rǟnka N_ĀITA  "karukko" ;
sidāmsõbrā+N:sidām#sõʼbrā N_SÕBRĀ  "sydänystävä" ;
sigāsēmḑa+N:sigā#sēmḑa N_SĒMḐA  "voikukka" ;
streppūlkad+N:strep#pūlka N_ĀITA-PL  "askelmat" ;
strepīd+N:strep N_KEP-PL  "portaat" ;
summa+N:summa N_LILLA  "summa" ;
sug+N:suʼg N_SUʼG  "sukulainen" ;
sõvpivād+N:sõʼv#piʼv N_TUBĀ-PL  "helluntai" ;
sīezõrāina+N:sīezõr#āina N_ĀINA  "ukontatar" ;
sūrkabāllōja+N:sūr#kabāl#lǭija N_LǬJA  "tykkivene" ;
sūrsušā+N:sūr#suššā N_SUŠĀ  "täti" ;
sǟrsukā+N:sǟr#sukkā N_SUKĀ  "" ;
tei+N:tei N_TEI  "täi" ;
tomātõdpuļ+N:tomātõd#puʼļļ N_PIʼŅ  "liemi" ;
toŗņkīela+N:toŗņ#kīella N_KĒRA  "tornikello" ;
truš+N:truš N_KAŠ  "kaniini" ;
tsitronpū+N:tsitron#pū N_PŪ  "sitruuna" ;
tsop+N:tsopp N_KEP  "palmikko" ;
tulkuoig+N:tuʼl#kuoʼig N_KUOʼIG  "majakkalaiva" ;
tīemizsõnā+N:tīemiz#sõʼn N_KALĀ  "teonsana" ;
tīetiegūd+N:tīe#tieʼg N_VAʼG-PL  "työasiat" ;
tōka+N:tōuka N_MȬKA  "terttu" ;
ulzajtõbāiga+N:ulz#aʼjtõb#āig N_ĀIGA  "" ;
ulzrabbõm+N:ulz#raʼbbõm N_¤29  "ryhelmä" ;
vaigā+N:vaʼig N_AIGĀ  "" ;
vanājoug+N:vanā#joʼug N_JOʼUG  "vanha joenuoma" ;
vațīd+N:vaț N_KUOȚ-PL  "topatakki" ;
vannizpǟvad+N:vaʼnniz#pǟuva N_PǞVA-PL  "vanhuuden päivät" ;
veispǟ+N:veis#pǟ N_PǞ  "veitsenpää" ;
virsnikā+N:virsnikkā N_KÄPĀ  "upseeri" ;
võlsõnād+N:võʼl#sõʼnā N_KALĀ-PL  "loitsu" ;
vēna+N:vēina N_VĒNA  "jokisuun satama" ;
vīrtša+N:vīrtša N_TŠŪRTŠA  "lantavesi" ;
vōjad+N:vǭija N_LǬJA-PL  "synnytyskipu" ;
vō+N:vǭʼ N_RǬʼ  "vaha" ;
vȯjā+N:vȯʼj N_TUBĀ  "" ;
vȯrdāinad+N:vȯrd#āina N_ĀINA-PL  "matolääke" ;
vȱntsa+N:vȱntsa N_VȰNTSA  "otsa" ;
äbī+N:äbī N_TORĪ  "häpeä" ;
älvib+N:äl#viʼb N_VAʼG  "" ;
ändõstpǟva+N:ändõst#pǟuva N_PǞVA  "toissa päivä" ;
ānkaŗplatš+N:ānkaŗ#platš N_OKŠ  "ankkuripaikka" ;
āļdža+N:āļdža N_ĀĻDŽA  "aivastus" ;
īrpūoga+N:īr#p N_PŪOGA  "hiirenpoikanen" ;
špits+N:špits N_KRUȚK  "huippu" ;
ūomõgkaffe+N:ūomõg#kaffe N_KAFFE  "aamukahvi" ;
ōrõndtei+N:ǭʼrõnd#tei N_TEI  "vaatetäi" ;
ȭdõgval+N:ȭʼdõg#vaʼl N_NIʼM  "iltarusko" ;
mierūška+N:mieʼr#ūiška N_ŪŠKA  "merikäärme" ;
kontaktpiezā+N:kontakt#pieʼzzā N_PIEZĀ  "pistorasia" ;
Saeima+N:Saeima N_KRǬIPA  "Latvian parlamentti" ;
uļļiztažād+N:uļļizt#aʼžžā N_AŽĀ-PL  "ulkoasiat" ;
īevakț+N:īe#vakț N_VAKȚ  "yövartija" ;
